Mississippi, session 2026, HB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-1-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-51.  (1)  It shall be the duty of the court clerk, upon conviction of any person holding a license issued pursuant to this article where the penalty for a traffic violation is as much as Ten Dollars ($10.00), to mail a copy of abstract of the court record or provide an electronically or computer generated copy of abstract of the court record immediately to the commissioner at Jackson, Mississippi, showing the date of conviction, penalty, etc., so that a record of same may be made by the Department of Public Safety.  The commissioner shall forthwith revoke the license of any person for a period of one (1) year upon receiving a duly certified record of each person's convictions of any of the following offenses when such conviction has become final: (a)  Manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle; (b)  Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used; (c)  Failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of this state in event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another; (d)  Perjury or the willful making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the department under this article or under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles; or (e)  Conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon three (3) charges of reckless driving committed within a period of twelve (12) months. (2)  The commissioner shall revoke the license issued pursuant to this article of any person convicted of negligent homicide, in addition to any penalty now provided by law. (3)  In addition to the reasons specified in this section, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the license issued to any person pursuant to this article for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  (a)  When a uniform traffic citation is issued and if the accused fails to appear for court or otherwise dispose of his or her charges before his or her scheduled court appearance as stated on the uniform traffic citation, before the court issuing a bench warrant, the clerk of court shall notify the accused by first-class mail or by postcard at the address listed on the uniform traffic citation of his or her failure to appear.  The notice shall be dated and allow the accused thirty (30) days from such date to dispose of his or her charges or waive arraignment and plead not guilty.  If after the expiration of the thirty-day period the accused fails to dispose of his or her charges or waive arraignment and plead not guilty, the clerk of the court in which the charges are lodged shall, within five (5) days of such date, forward driver's license number of the accused to the Department of Public Safety-Driver Services Bureau unless otherwise ordered by the court.  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall, upon receipt of the  driver's license number, suspend the driver's license and driving privilege of the accused until notified by the clerk of court that the driver's license is to be reinstated.  The driver's license shall be reinstated when the accused has scheduled a new date to appear before the court; has appeared in court for a hearing, arraignment, or waiver of arraignment and entry of a plea; or the charge against the accused has been finally adjudicated and the Department of Driver Services receives notice to reinstate the license by the court and the accused individual pays the applicable reinstatement fee as set forth in Section 63-1-46, unless such fee is waived by the court or otherwise as provided by law. (b)  (i)  The scheduling of a new date to appear before the court for disposition of a uniform traffic citation shall not be conditioned upon payment of any fee for a previous failure to appear. (ii)  After the clerk of the court has notified the Driver Services Bureau of a license reinstatement based upon a newly scheduled date for an accused to appear before the court pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, when the accused requests, for a second or subsequent time, a new date for disposition of the same uniform traffic citation, the court may forward to the Driver Services Bureau the driver's license number of the accused.  The commissioner of driver services shall suspend the driver's license and driving privilege of the accused until notified by the clerk of the court that the driver's license of the accused is to be reinstated.  Nothing in this subsection shall require a clerk of the court to suspend the driver's license of an accused who schedules a second or subsequent new date for disposition of the same uniform traffic citation pursuant to this subparagraph. (iii)  When the accused fails, for a second or subsequent time, to appear for court or otherwise dispose of his or her charges before his or her newly scheduled court appearance for disposition of the same uniform traffic citation, the court may forward to the Driver Services Bureau the driver's license number of the accused.  The commissioner of driver services shall suspend the driver's license and driving privileges of the accused until notified by the clerk of the court that the driver's license of the accused is to be reinstated. Nothing in this subsection shall require a clerk of the court to suspend the driver's license of an accused who fails to appear for court pursuant to this subparagraph. (iv)  Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a court from establishing a policy or practice, by standing order or otherwise, to reinstate the driver's license of an accused. (v)  Any notification to suspend or reinstate the driver's license and driving privileges of the accused shall be compliant with procedures established by the Driver Services Bureau. SECTION 2.  Section 63-1-216, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-216.  (1)  (a)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year if the person's license or permit to drive has been administratively suspended under Section 63-11-23 or the person has been convicted of a first violation of: (i)  Operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths percent (0.04%) or more, or under the influence as provided in Section 63-11-30; (ii)  Failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another; (iii)  Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year; (iv)  Refusal to submit to a test to determine the operator's alcohol concentration, as provided in Title 63, Chapter 11, Mississippi Code of 1972; (v)  Operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths percent (0.08%) or more, or under the influence of intoxicating liquor or other substance, as provided in Section 63-11-30; (vi)  Operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug to a degree which renders the person incapable of driving safely as provided in Section 63-11-30; (vii)  Operating or attempting to operate a commercial motor vehicle while the license is revoked, suspended, cancelled, or disqualified; (viii)  Operating a commercial motor vehicle in a negligent manner resulting in a fatal injury. (b)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for three (3) years if convicted of a violation listed in subsection (1) of this section, if the violation occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded. (c)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if convicted of two (2) or more  violations or a combination of them listed in subsection (1) of this section arising from two (2) or more separate occurrences. (d)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days if convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations, or one hundred twenty (120) days if convicted of three (3) serious traffic violations, arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period.  A disqualification for three (3) serious traffic violations must be imposed consecutively to any other previous period of disqualification. (e)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person uses a motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a regulated drug, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a regulated drug and for which the person was convicted. (f)  A person who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle shall surrender the person's Mississippi commercial driver's license no later than the effective date of the disqualification.  Upon receipt of the person's commercial driver's license, that person, if otherwise eligible, may apply for a non-CDL, and upon payment of sufficient fees receive the driver's license. (g)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall adopt rules establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which a disqualification for life under this section, except for a disqualification issued pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection, may be reduced to a period of not less than ten (10) years. (h)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days if the driver is convicted of a first violation of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation. (i)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a second railroad-highway grade crossing violation in a separate incident. (j)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one (1) year if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents. (k)  A person who is simultaneously subject to a disqualification issued by the administrator of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration pursuant to 49 CFR, Part 383.52 and a disqualification under any other provision of this section shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently. (2)  (a)  A person's privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for one (1) year, if: (i)  The person is convicted of a first violation of operating, attempting to operate or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths percent (0.04%) or more, or under the influence, as provided in Section 63-11-30; and (ii)  The person's commercial driver's license is issued by a state or country that does not issue commercial driver's licenses and disqualify persons in accordance with 49 CFR, Parts 383 and 384. (b)  A person's privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for three (3) years if the person is convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section, and the violation occurred while the person was transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded. (c)  A person's privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for life if the person is convicted a second time of violating subsection (1) of this section, and both convictions arise out of separate occurrences. (d)  A person's privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for sixty (60) days if the person is convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations, or for one hundred twenty (120) days if the person is convicted of three (3) serious traffic violations, arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period. (e)  A person's privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Mississippi shall be suspended for life if the person uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year, involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a regulated drug, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a regulated drug, and for which the person was convicted. (f)  In addition to the reasons specified in this section for suspension of the commercial driver's license, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the commercial driver's license of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a commercial driver's license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a commercial driver's license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a commercial driver's license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (g)  In addition to the reasons specified in this section for suspension of the commercial driver's license, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the commercial driver's license of any person who fails to appear for court or otherwise dispose of his or her charges of a serious traffic violation before his or her scheduled court appearance as prescribed in Section 63-1-51(4).  The procedure for suspension of a commercial driver's license for failure to appear, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a commercial driver's license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a commercial driver's license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 63-1-51. (3)  A person shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person is convicted of any crime under the Mississippi Human Trafficking Act in Section 97-3-54 et seq. or any felony involving a severe form of trafficking in persons, as defined by 22 USC 7102(11). SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.